Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5678.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 21795a. (1) The department, in consultation with the department of health and human services, shall establish and administer a fall prevention training program for unlicensed personnel working in a nursing home. (2) A nursing home shall ensure that unlicensed personnel working in the nursing home complete the fall prevention training program described in subsection (1).